Washington statutes.
RCW 35.20.140

Monthly meeting of judges—Rules and regulations of court.

It shall be the duty of the judges to meet together at least once each month, except during the months of July and August, at such hour and place as they may designate, and at such other times as they may desire, for the consideration of such matters pertaining to the administration of justice in said court as may be brought before them. At these meetings they shall receive and investigate, or cause to be investigated, all complaints presented to them pertaining to the court and the employees thereof, and shall take such action as they may deem necessary or proper with respect thereto. They shall have power and it shall be their duty to adopt, or cause to be adopted, rules and regulations for the proper administration of justice in said court.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.20.140. Prior: 1955 c 290 s 14.]